vi: Kích thước cán vợt tennis: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Khác
zh-TW: 網球拍握把尺寸: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); 其他
sv: Tennisracket – greppstorlek: L0 (4 tum / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 tum / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 tum / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 tum / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 tum / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 tum / 118 mm); Annat
ja: テニスラケットグリップサイズ: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); その他
sk-SK: Veľkosť úchopu tenisovej rakety: L0 (4 palce / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 palca / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 palca / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 palca / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 palca / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 palca / 118 mm); Iné
th: ขนาดด้ามจับไม้เทนนิส: L0 (4 นิ้ว / 100 มม.); L1 (4 1/8 นิ้ว / 105 มม.); L2 (4 1/4 นิ้ว / 108 มม.); L3 (4 3/8 นิ้ว / 111 มม.); L4 (4 1/2 นิ้ว / 114 มม.); L5 (4 5/8 นิ้ว / 118 มม.); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Raquete de tênis tamanho da empunhadura: L0 (4 pol. / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 pol. / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 pol. / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 pol. / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 pol. / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 pol. / 118 mm); Outro
pt-PT: Tamanho do punho da raquete de ténis: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Outro
lt-LT: Teniso raketės rankenos dydis: L0 (4 col. / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 col. / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 col. / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 col. / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 col. / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 col. / 118 mm); Kita
pl: Rozmiar rękojeści rakiety tenisowej: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Inny
sl-SI: Velikost ročaja teniškega loparja: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Drugo
bg-BG: Размер на дръжката на тенис ракета: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Друго
el: Μέγεθος λαβής ρακέτας τένις: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Άλλο
ro-RO: Mărime a mânerului pentru racheta de tenis: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Altele
zh-CN: 网球拍握柄尺寸: L0（4 英寸/100 毫米）; L1（4 1/8 英寸/105 毫米）; L2（4 1/4 英寸/108 毫米）; L3（4 3/8 英寸/111 毫米）; L4（4 1/2 英寸/114 毫米）; L5（4 5/8 英寸/118 毫米）; 其他
cs: Velikost rukojeti tenisové rakety: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Jiné
fr: Taille du grip de la raquette de tennis: L0 (4 po / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 po / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 po / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 po / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 po / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 po / 118 mm); Autre
tr: Tenis raketi tutuş ölçüsü: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Diğer
en: Tennis racket grip size: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Other
hu: Teniszütő markolatmérete: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Egyéb
de: Griffgröße des Tennisschlägers: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Sonstige
nl: Tennisracket gripmaat: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Overig
nb: Størrelse på tennisrackethåndtak: L0 (4 tommer / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 tommer / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 tommer / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 tommer / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 tommer / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 tommer / 118 mm); Annet
it: Misura dell'impugnatura della racchetta da tennis: L0 (4 pollici / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 pollici / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 pollici / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 pollici / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 pollici / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 pollici / 118 mm); Altro
es: Tamaño de la empuñadura de la raqueta de tenis: L0 (4 pulg. / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 pulg. / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 pulg. / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 pulg. / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 pulg. / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 pulg. / 118 mm); Otro
da: Grebsstørrelse for tennisketsjer: L0 (4 tommer / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 tommer / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 tommer / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 tommer / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 tommer / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 tommer / 118 mm); Andet
ko: 테니스 라켓 그립 사이즈: L0(4인치/100mm); L1(4 1/8인치/105mm); L2(4 1/4인치/108mm); L3(4 3/8인치/111mm); L4(4 1/2인치/114mm); L5(4 5/8인치/118mm); 기타
hr-HR: Veličina gripa za teniski reket: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Ostalo
ru: Размер рукоятки теннисной ракетки: L0 (4 дюйма / 100 мм); L1 (4 1/8 дюйма / 105 мм); L2 (4 1/4 дюйма / 108 мм); L3 (4 3/8 дюйма / 111 мм); L4 (4 1/2 дюйма / 114 мм); L5 (4 5/8 дюйма / 118 мм); Другое
fi: Tennismailan kahvakoko: L0 (4 in / 100 mm); L1 (4 1/8 in / 105 mm); L2 (4 1/4 in / 108 mm); L3 (4 3/8 in / 111 mm); L4 (4 1/2 in / 114 mm); L5 (4 5/8 in / 118 mm); Muu